Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2380.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) The retirement benefit, pension or annuity payments
accruing after June 30, 2025, to each retirant shall be increased by a cost-
of-living adjustment in an amount as provided in subsection (b). Such
payments shall be paid by the retirement system to the retirant.
(b) Each retirant who is 85 years of age or older on July 1, 2025, and
who is entitled to receive a retirement benefit, pension or annuity payment
from the retirement system on July 1, 2025, shall have such retirement
benefit, pension or annuity increased by $150 per month of the retirement
benefit, pension or annuity payment in effect on July 1, 2025.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) "Retirant" means any:
(A) Person who is a member or special member of the retirement
system pursuant to the provisions of K.S.A. 74-4901 et seq., and
amendments thereto, and who is 85 years of age or older on July 1, 2025;
and
(B) person who is a joint annuitant or beneficiary of any member
described in subparagraph (A); and
(2) "retirement system" means the Kansas public employees
retirement system, the Kansas police and firemen's retirement system, the
state school retirement system and the retirement system for judges.
(d) The provisions of this section shall be a part of and supplemental
to K.S.A. 74-4901 et seq., and amendments thereto.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.